Utah statutes.
77-38-8.   Age-appropriate language at judicial proceedings -- Advisor.

(1)  In any criminal proceeding or juvenile court proceeding regarding or involving a child, examination and cross-examination of a victim or witness 13 years of age or younger shall be conducted in age-appropriate language.

(2) (a)  The court may appoint an advisor to assist a witness 13 years of age or younger in understanding questions asked by counsel.

(b)  The advisor is not required to be an attorney.

